Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.220

Investigations—Penalty for failure to identify contractor.

Wilful refusal to provide information identifying a contractor as required by RCW 18.27.210 is a misdemeanor.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 2 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1983 1st ex.s. c 2: See note following RCW 18.27.200.